Hawaii statutes.
§571-74 Rules and standards;
investigation and questioning; fingerprinting and photographing. The
judges of the family courts shall make such rules and set up such standards of
investigation and questioning as they consider necessary to guide and control
the police, within their respective jurisdictions, in the handling of cases
involving minors coming within provisions of this chapter. The rules and
standards may include limitations and restrictions concerning the
fingerprinting and photographing of any child in police custody, except that
when any child of the age of twelve years or older who comes within section
571-11(1) is taken into custody for committing an act which, if committed by an
adult would be a felony, a misdemeanor, or a petty misdemeanor any limitation
or restriction concerning fingerprinting shall not apply. The police shall
report all police designated fields of information collected on juvenile
offenders to the juvenile justice information system. The rules shall be
enforceable as orders of the court. [L 1965, c 232, pt of §1; Supp, §333-35;
HRS §571-74; am L 1977, c 172, §1; am L 1991, c 311, §4; am L 1995, c 100, §1;
am L 1997, c 292, §1]

Cross References

Juvenile justice information system, see chapter 846D.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next